liblouis-back-translation-tables/ml-in-g3-abk.utb
sufword  \x0D2F\x0D4D\x200D		3-13456 # MALAYALAM LETTER YA
sufword  \x0D30\x0D4D\x200D		3-1235 # MALAYALAM LETTER RA
sufword  \x0D31\x0D4D\x200D		3-12456 # MALAYALAM LETTER RRA
sufword  \x0D32\x0D4D\x200D		3-123 # MALAYALAM LETTER LA
sufword  \x0D33\x0D4D\x200D		3-456 # MALAYALAM LETTER LLA
sufword  \x0D34\x0D4D\x200D		3-12356 # MALAYALAM LETTER LLLA= ZHA
sufword  \x0D35\x0D4D\x200D		3-1236 # MALAYALAM LETTER VA
sufword  \x0D36\x0D4D\x200D		3-146 # MALAYALAM LETTER SHA= SOFT SHA
sufword  \x0D37\x0D4D\x200D		3-12346 # MALAYALAM LETTER SSA= SHA
sufword  \x0D38\x0D4D\x200D		3-234 # MALAYALAM LETTER SA
sufword  \x0D39\x0D4D\x200D		3-125 # MALAYALAM LETTER HA


always	\x0D03	6	# MALAYALAM SIGN VISARGA

sufword	\x0D23	56-3456	# MALAYALAM LETTER NNA

endword \x0D4D\x0022 3-356 # MALAYALAM SIGN VIRAMA + QUOTATION MARK

endword \x0022 356 # QUOTATION MARK

always \x002E 256 # FULL STOP

always \x002C 2 # COMMA

always \x002E\x0022 256-356 # FULL STOP + QUOTATION MARK

endword \x0027 356-3 # APOSTROPHE

endword \x0D4D\x0027 3-356-3 # MALAYALAM SIGN VIRAMA + APOSTROPHE 

endword \x0D4D\x003A 3-25 # MALAYALAM SIGN VIRAMA + COLON

endword \x0D4D\x003B 3-23 # MALAYALAM SIGN VIRAMA + SEMICOLON

endword \x002A 35-35 # ASTERISK
endword \x0D40\x002A 35-35-35 # MALAYALAM VOWEL SIGN II + ASTERISK

include en-in-g1.ctb

always	\x0D15\x0D4D\x0D15	5-13	# MALAYALAM LETTER KKA
always	\x0D23\x0D4D\x0D23	5-3456	# MALAYALAM LETTER NNA

midendword	\x0D33\x0D4D\x200D\x0D23 	3-456-3456	# MALAYALAM LLNNAA
midendword	\x0D30\x0D4D\x200D\x0D23  	3-12456-3456 # MALAYALAM RRRNNNAA
midendword	\x0D32\x0D4D\x200D\x0D23   	3-123-3456	# MALAYALAM LETTER KKA

endword  \x0D16\x002C 46-2 # MALAYALAM LETTER KHA + COMMA
